Mississippi statutes. Title 3. State sovereignty, jurisdiction and holidays
Chapter 5. Acquisition of Land by United States Government

§ 3-5-1.
Consent given for acquisition of land by the United States for certain purposes.

The consent of the State of Mississippi is given, in accordance with the 17th Clause, 8th Section, and of the 1st article of the Constitution of the United States, to the acquisition by the United States, by purchase, condemnation or otherwise, of any land in this state which has heretofore been or may hereafter be acquired for custom houses, post offices, or other public buildings.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6055; 1942, § 4153; 1928, chs. 4, 85; brought forward without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 347, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 3-5-3.
Governor may cede jurisdiction to the United States for certain purposes.

The governor, upon application made to him in writing, on behalf of the United States, for the purpose of acquiring and holding lands or using any part of a public road of any county within the limits of this state, for the purpose of making, building, or constructing levees, canals, or any other works in connection with the improvement of rivers and harbors, or as a site for a fort, magazine, arsenal, dockyard, courthouse, custom house, lighthouse, post office, or other needful buildings, or for the purpose of locating and maintaining national military parks, or for any other public works or purposes accompanied by proper evidence of the purchase of such lands, or the consent of the board of supervisors of the proper county for such public roads to be used for said purpose, is authorized for the state to cede jurisdiction thereof to the United States for the purpose of the cession and none other.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2178; 1906 § 2395; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4788; 1930, § 6059; 1942, § 4157; Laws, 1900, ch. 67.

§ 3-5-5.
Jurisdiction; relinquishment of jurisdiction to state as to land under control of federal Administrator of Veterans Affairs.

The exclusive jurisdiction in and over any land which has heretofore been, or may hereafter be, so acquired by the United States is hereby ceded to the United States for all purposes, except that the state retains the right to serve thereon all civil and criminal processes as provided in Section 3-5-9. The jurisdiction ceded hereby shall not vest until the United States shall have acquired title to the lands by purchase, condemnation, or otherwise, and shall continue no longer than the United States shall own such lands for the purposes for which acquired.

Full or partial jurisdiction may be relinquished to the state as to land or interests therein under the supervision and control of the Administrator of Veterans Affairs of the United States or the Secretary of the United States Army as follows:

Notice in writing by the Administrator of Veterans Affairs or the Secretary of the United States Army shall be given to the Governor stating the intent to relinquish jurisdiction and stating specifically the extent of such relinquishment.

The Governor may reject such relinquishment of jurisdiction by Executive Order filed with the Secretary of State prior to the effective date of such relinquishment. Upon request of any party or court, the Secretary of State shall certify by letter which shall be sufficient proof the existence or nonexistence of such executive order.

Such relinquishment shall be effective as of 12 midnight of the last day of the month next succeeding the month in which such notice is received by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6057; 1942, §§ 4154, 4155; Laws, 1928, chs. 4, 85; Laws, 1977, ch. 331; Laws, 1994, ch. 638, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 3-5-7.
Tax exemption.

So long as the lands acquired by the United States pursuant to Sections 3-5-1 and 3-5-3 shall remain the property of the United States, and no longer, the same shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation, assessment, or other charges which may be levied or imposed under authority of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6057; 1942, § 4155; Laws, 1928, chs. 4, 85.

§ 3-5-9.
Restrictions on cession.

The concession of jurisdiction to the United States over any part of the territory of the state, heretofore or hereafter made, shall not prevent the execution on such land of any process, civil or criminal, under the authority of this state, nor prevent the laws of this state from operating over such land; saving to the United States security to its property within the limits of the jurisdiction ceded.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2179; 1906, § 2396; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4789; 1930, § 6060; 1942, § 4158.

§ 3-5-11.
State forfeited tax lands may be sold to the United States for certain purposes.

The land commissioner, with the approval of the governor, is hereby authorized to sell to the United States any state forfeited tax lands held by the state which lie within the boundaries of the DeSoto National Forest, or which lie within the boundaries of any national park or game preserve; provided, however, that in the event such lands are sold to the United States under the provisions of this section, all oil, gas and other mineral rights shall be reserved to the State of Mississippi, and such reservation shall be expressly incorporated in the patent. The limitation imposed by law upon the quantity of state forfeited tax lands which may be sold to a single individual shall not apply to sales of lands to the United States government under the provisions of this section; nor shall the amount of such lands embraced in a patent to the United States be limited to one-quarter of a section.

In cases where, in the opinion of the attorneys for the United States, the title to any such land is defective, and it is desirable to take the same by condemnation in the federal court, the attorney general of the State of Mississippi is hereby authorized to accept service of summons, or other legal process, or to enter an appearance on behalf of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4091; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 3-5-13.
National forest lands; acreage limitations; exemptions.

The consent of the State of Mississippi is hereby given to the acquisition by the United States, by purchase or gift, of land within or adjacent to existing national forests in Mississippi, subject to prior approval of: (1) the board of supervisors of the county wherein such land is located, by order spread upon its minutes; and (2) the Mississippi Forestry Commission; provided, however, that not more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) acres may be acquired in the entire state under the provisions of this section and Section 3-5-15.

Provided further, that not more than five hundred (500) acres may be purchased or donated in any one (1) county outside the existing boundaries of any one (1) existing national forest.

The provisions of this section and Section 3-5-15 shall not apply to, or be construed to prohibit, any landowner owning lands in the State of Mississippi who may desire to exchange any part or all of such lands with the United States Government, or any agency thereof, within the external boundaries of an existing national forest for an equal amount of land or lands of equal value owned by the United States Government, or any agency thereof.

There is hereby exempted from the provisions of this section and Section 3-5-15 any county in which State Highway No. 18 intersects State Highway No. 35 and any county in which State Highway No. 18 intersects State Highway No. 15.

There is hereby exempted from the provisions of this section any lands sold and conveyed by the State of Mississippi pursuant to Laws, 1998, ch. 304, § 1.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 4156-01, 4156-02; Laws, 1966, ch. 675, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 304, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved February 25, 1998).

§ 3-5-15.
National forest lands; concurrent jurisdiction; grant of power to Congress.

The State of Mississippi shall retain concurrent jurisdiction with the United States in and over such lands which have heretofore been acquired by the United States, or that may be acquired under the provisions of Sections 3-5-13 and 3-5-15, and there is reserved to the state in such lands full civil and criminal jurisdiction concurrently with the federal government in all violations of the state and federal laws, and civil process in all cases, and such criminal process as may issue under the authority of the State of Mississippi against any person charged with the commission of any crime without or within the jurisdiction heretofore acquired by the United States over such lands, may be executed thereon in like manner as before the acquisition of the land by the United States. Power is hereby conferred upon the congress of the United States to pass such laws and to make or provide for the making of such rules of both civil and criminal nature and provide punishment for violation thereof as, in its judgment, may be necessary for the management, control and protection of such lands as have heretofore been acquired by the United States or that may be acquired under the provisions of Sections 3-5-13 and 3-5-15.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4156-03; Laws, 1966, ch. 675, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1966).

§ 3-5-17.
Municipality may lease to United States.

Any municipality owning lands that the government of the United States or any department or agency thereof, desires to use for national defense purposes may, in the discretion of the governing authorities of such municipality, lease such lands to the government of the United States of America or any department or agency thereof, for national defense purposes on such terms and conditions as the governing authorities of such municipality may agree upon, and in the event any lands are leased under the provisions of this section to the United States government, any department or agency thereof, such land shall be exempt from all taxation the same as if title thereto was vested in the United States of America.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4128; Laws, 1942, ch. 171.